Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TASK FORCE ON ESTABLISHING A YELLOW ALERT SYSTEM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force on Establishing a Yellow Alert System is established to design a system to enlist public assistance in rapidly locating vehicles that leave the scene of a hit-and-run accident and make policy and funding recommendations to the legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Bodily harm" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 609.02, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (c) "Great bodily harm" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 609.02, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (d) "Hit-and-run accident" means a situation in which a driver fails to remain at the scene of a collision that resulted in injury to or death of another person in violation of Minnesota Statutes, section 169.09, subdivision (1) or (6). new text end new text begin (e) "Substantial bodily harm" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 609.02, subdivision 7a. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of public safety or designee; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of transportation or designee; new text end new text begin (3) the chief of the State Patrol or designee; new text end new text begin (4) the statewide Toward Zero Deaths coordinator or designee; new text end new text begin (5) a member appointed by the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association; new text end new text begin (6) a member appointed by the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association; new text end new text begin (7) a member from the Minnesota Safety Council, appointed by the chair of the board of directors; new text end new text begin (8) a member from the Center for Transportation Studies at the University of Minnesota, appointed by the chair of the executive committee; new text end new text begin (9) a member appointed by the Advisory Council on Traffic Safety; new text end new text begin (10) a member representing vulnerable road users, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (11) a member representing contractors engaged in construction and maintenance of highways, appointed by the governor; and new text end new text begin (12) a member of the public with knowledge about similar systems established in other locations, appointed by the governor. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made no later than September 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Members shall serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until the task force expires. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee shall convene the first meeting of the task force by October 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) At the first meeting, the members of the task force shall elect a chair and may elect other officers as the members deem necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force shall meet monthly or as determined by the chair. The task force shall meet sufficiently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) collect data on hit-and-run accidents in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) analyze alert systems used in other states to help facilitate the apprehension of persons who cause a hit-and-run accident; new text end new text begin (3) determine the type of hit-and-run accident that should trigger the use of an alert system, such as when an accident causes bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, great bodily harm, or death; new text end new text begin (4) determine what state agencies or other government entities should coordinate for oversight and control of the alert system; new text end new text begin (5) develop procedures for law enforcement agencies and others to provide information that would be used in an alert; new text end new text begin (6) recommend procedures to confirm information received from law enforcement agencies and others and to provide verified information to appropriate partner organizations; new text end new text begin (7) establish the standard form and method for providing alerts to the public; new text end new text begin (8) establish a timeline for implementing a notification system; and new text end new text begin (9) make recommendations for legislation and funding for the alert system. new text end new text begin (b) At its discretion, the task force may examine other related issues consistent with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the task force must submit a report to the chairs, cochairs, and any ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over public safety finance and transportation on the work of the task force including any recommendations for legislation or funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting its report under subdivision 6. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TASK FORCE ON ESTABLISHING A YELLOW ALERT SYSTEM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to implement the Task Force on Establishing a Yellow Alert System. new text end